California statutes. Vehicle Code
(c) The maximum penalty for each toll evasion violation included in a notice of toll evasion for either a toll highway, toll road, or express lane shall be sixty dollars ($60). The maximum cumulative toll evasion penalty shall not exceed one hundred dollars ($100) for each individual toll evasion violation.

(d) Toll evasion penalties under this article shall be collected as civil penalties.

(e) The amounts specified in this section may be adjusted periodically by an issuing
 agency at a rate not to exceed any increase in the California Consumer Price Index as compiled and reported by the Department of Industrial Relations.

(f) An issuing agency shall waive the toll evasion penalty for a first violation with the issuing agency if the person contacts, as applicable, the issuing or processing agency customer service center within 21 days from the mailing of the notice of toll evasion violation, and the person is not currently an accountholder with the issuing agency, signs up for an account, and pays the outstanding toll.

(g) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2024.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 12) and added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 969, Sec. 13.   (AB 2594)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative July 1, 2024, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

40259.

If the toll evasion penalty is received by the person authorized to receive the deposit of the toll evasion penalty and there is no contest as to that toll evasion violation, the proceedings under this article shall terminate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 739, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

40260.

(a) If the payment of the toll evasion penalty is not received by the person authorized to receive a deposit of the toll evasion penalty by the time and date fixed for appearance on the notice of toll evasion violation under Section 40254, the processing agency shall serve or mail to the registered owner a notice of delinquent toll evasion violation.

(b) Delivery of a notice of delinquent toll evasion violation under this section may be made by personal service or by first-class mail addressed to the registered owner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 739, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

40261.

(a) Within 10 days from the mailing of a notice of delinquent toll evasion violation, any person or his or her agent, may request by mail or in person a photostatic copy or an electronically produced facsimile of the original notice of toll evasion violation. The issuing agency may charge a fee sufficient to recover the actual cost of providing the copy, not to exceed two dollars ($2). Within 15 days of the request, the processing agency shall mail or otherwise provide the copy. Until the issuing agency complies with a request for a copy of the original notice of toll evasion violation, the processing agency may not proceed pursuant to subdivision (i) of Section 22651, or Section 22651.7 or 40267.

(b) If the description of the vehicle on the notice of toll evasion violation does not match the department’s corresponding vehicle registration record, the processing agency may, on written request of the person, cancel the notice of toll evasion violation without the necessity of an appearance by that person.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 739, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

40262.

(a) (1) The notice of delinquent toll evasion violation shall contain the information specified in Section 40254 and, additionally shall contain a notice to the registered owner that, unless the registered owner pays the toll evasion penalty or contests the notice within 30 days after mailing of the notice of delinquent toll evasion violation or completes and files an affidavit of nonliability that complies with Section 40263 or 40264, the renewal of the vehicle registration shall be contingent upon compliance with the notice of delinquent toll evasion violation.

(2) If the toll evasion penalty is not paid as specified in the notice of delinquent toll evasion violation, the issuing agency may notify the department and the
 department shall refuse to renew that person’s vehicle registration pursuant to Section 4770. If the registered owner pays the toll, toll evasion penalty, and all related fees, or enters into a payment plan pursuant to Section 40269.5 and makes the first payment, the issuing or processing agency shall notify the department electronically, and the department shall not refuse renewal of the person’s vehicle registration. If the issuing agency subsequently notifies the department electronically that the registered owner is delinquent under the payment plan for more than 10 business days, the department shall refuse to renew the vehicle registration until the registered owner has fully satisfied the terms of the payment plan and the issuing agency has notified the department electronically.

(3) Notwithstanding paragraph (2), if a registered owner pays the toll, toll evasion penalty, and all related fees, or has entered into a payment plan
 authorized pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 40269.5, and meets the agency’s requirements for that payment plan, the issuing or processing agency shall notify the department electronically, and the department shall not refuse renewal of the person’s vehicle registration. If the registered owner is delinquent under the payment plan for more than 10 business days and the issuing agency or processing agency subsequently notifies the department electronically, the department shall refuse to renew the vehicle registration until the registered owner has fully satisfied the terms of the payment plan and the issuing agency and the issuing agency has notified the department electronically.

(b) If the registered owner, by appearance or by mail, makes payment to the processing agency within 15 days of the mailing of the notice of delinquent toll evasion violation, the toll evasion penalty shall consist of the amount of the original penalty without
 any additional administrative fees or charges.

(c) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2024.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 14) and added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 969, Sec. 15.   (AB 2594)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative July 1, 2024, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

40262.5.

If the registered owner fails to pay the toll evasion penalty, as required in Section 40262, or fails to contest the violation, as provided in Section 40255, the registered owner shall be deemed liable for the violation by operation of law, and the toll evasion penalty and any administrative fees or charges shall be considered a debt due and owing the issuing agency by the registered owner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 739, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

40263.

The notice of delinquent toll evasion violation shall contain, or be accompanied with, an affidavit of nonliability and information of what constitutes nonliability, information as to the effect of executing the affidavit, and instructions for returning the affidavit to the issuing agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 739, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

40264.

If the affidavit of nonliability is returned to the agency within 30 days of the mailing of the notice of toll evasion violation together with the proof of a written rental agreement or lease between a bona fide renting or leasing company and its customer which identifies the rentee or lessee and provides the driver’s license number, name, and address of the rentee or lessee, the processing agency shall serve or mail to the rentee or lessee identified in the affidavit of nonliability a notice of delinquent toll evasion violation. If payment is not received within 15 days of the mailing of the notice of delinquent toll evasion violation, the processing agency may proceed against the rentee or lessee pursuant to Section 40267.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 739, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

40265.

(a) If the affidavit of nonliability is returned and indicates that the registered owner served has made a bona fide sale or transfer of the vehicle and has delivered possession of the vehicle to the purchaser prior to the date of the alleged violation, the processing agency shall obtain verification from the department that the registered owner has complied with subdivision (b) of Section 5602.

(b) If the registered owner has complied with subdivision (b) of Section 5602, the processing agency shall cancel the notice of toll evasion violation with respect to the registered owner.

(c) If the registered owner has not complied with subdivision (b) of Section 5602, the processing agency shall inform the registered owner that the notice shall be paid in full or contested pursuant to Section 40255 unless the registered owner delivers evidence within 15 days of the notice that establishes that the transfer of ownership and possession of the vehicle occurred prior to the date of the alleged violation. If the registered owner does not comply with this notice, the processing agency shall proceed pursuant to Section 40220. If the registered owner delivers the evidence within 15 days of the notice, the processing agency shall cancel the notice of delinquent toll evasion violation or violations with respect to the registered owner.

(d) For purposes of subdivision (c), evidence sufficient to establish that the transfer of ownership and possession occurred prior to the date of the alleged violation or violations shall include, but is not limited to, a copy of the executed agreement showing the date of the transfer of vehicle ownership.

(e) This section does not limit or impair the ability or the right of the processing agency to pursue the collection of delinquent toll evasion penalties from the person having ownership and possession of the vehicle on the date the alleged violation occurred.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 741, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

40266.

(a) If the registered owner, or an agent of the registered owner, or a rentee or lessee who was served with the notice of delinquent toll evasion violation pursuant to Section 40260 or 40264, or any other person who presents the notice of toll evasion violation or notice of delinquent toll evasion violation after the notice of delinquent toll evasion violation has been issued for delivery under Section 40260, deposits that toll evasion violation penalty with a person authorized to receive it, the processing agency shall do both of the following:

(1) Deliver a copy of the notice of delinquent toll evasion violation issued under Section 40260, or a listing of the notice information presented in a notice of delinquent toll evasion violation to the person and record the name, address, and driver’s license number of the person actually given the copy in the records of the issuing agency.

For the purposes of this paragraph, a copy of the notice of delinquent toll evasion violation may be a photostatic copy.

(2) Determine whether the notice of delinquent toll evasion violation has been filed with the department pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 40267 or a civil judgment has been entered pursuant to Section 40267.

(b) If the notice of delinquent toll evasion violation has not been filed with the department or judgment entered and payment of the toll evasion penalty and any applicable assessments is received, the proceedings under this article shall terminate.

(c) If the notice of delinquent toll evasion violation has been filed with the department, has been returned to the processing agency pursuant to subdivision (b) or (c) of Section 4770 or pursuant to Section 4774, and payment of the toll evasion penalty together with the administrative service fee of the processing agency for costs of service and any applicable assessment is received, the proceedings under this article shall terminate.

(d) If the notice of delinquent toll evasion violation has been filed with the department and has not been returned to the processing agency pursuant to Section 4770, 4772, or 4774, and payment of the toll evasion penalty together with the administrative fee of the department established under Section 4773, and administrative service fee of the issuing agency for costs of service, and any applicable assessments is received by the processing agency, the processing agency shall do all of the following:

(1) Immediately transmit the payment information to the department in the manner prescribed by the department.

(2) Terminate proceedings on the notice of delinquent toll evasion violation.

(3) Transmit for deposit all toll evasion penalties and assessments in accordance with law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 739, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

40267.

Except as otherwise provided in Sections 40268 and 40269, the processing agency shall proceed under one or more of the following options to collect an unpaid toll evasion penalty:

(a) The processing agency may file an itemization of unpaid toll evasion penalties and administrative and service fees with the department for collection with the registration of the vehicle pursuant to Section 4770.

(b) (1) If more than four hundred dollars ($400) in unpaid penalties and fees have been accrued by a person or registered owner, the processing agency may file proof of that fact with the court with the same effect as a civil judgment. Execution may be levied and other measures may be taken for the collection of the judgment as are authorized for the collection of an unpaid civil judgment entered against a defendant in an action on a debt. The court may assess costs against a judgment debtor to be paid upon satisfaction of the judgment. The processing agency shall send a notice by first-class mail to the person or registered owner indicating that a judgment shall be entered for the unpaid penalties, fees, and costs and that, after 30 days from the date of the mailing of the notice, the judgment shall have the same effect as an entry of judgment against a judgment debtor. The person or registered owner shall also be notified at that time that execution may be levied against his or her assets, liens may be placed against his or her property, his or her wages may be garnished, and other steps may be taken to satisfy the judgment. The filing fee plus any costs of collection shall be added to the judgment amount.

(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the processing agency shall pay the established first paper civil filing fee, if required by law, at the time an entry of civil judgment is requested.

(c) If the registration of the vehicle has not been renewed for 60 days beyond the renewal date, and the notice has not been collected by the department pursuant to Section 4770, the processing agency may file proof of unpaid penalties and fees with the court with the same effect as a civil judgment as provided in subdivision (b), except that if the amount of the unpaid penalties and fees is not more than four hundred dollars ($400), the filing fee shall be collectible by the court from the debtor.

(d) The issuing agency may contract with a collection agency to collect unpaid toll evasion penalties, fees, and charges.

(e) This section does not apply to the registered owner of a vehicle if the toll evasion violation occurred prior to the registered owner taking possession of the vehicle and the department has notified the processing agency pursuant to Section 4774.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 741, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

40268.

The processing agency shall not file a civil judgment with the court relating to a toll evasion violation which has been filed with the department unless the processing agency has determined that the registration of the vehicle has not been renewed for 60 days beyond the renewal date and the notice has not been collected by the department pursuant to Section 4770.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 739, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

40269.

(a) The processing agency shall terminate proceedings on the notice of a delinquent toll evasion violation in any of the following cases:

(1) Upon receipt of collected penalties and administrative fees remitted by the department under Section 4772 for that notice of delinquent toll evasion violation. The termination under this subdivision is by satisfaction of the toll evasion penalty.

(2) If the notice of delinquent toll evasion violation was returned to the processing agency pursuant to Section 4774 and five years have elapsed since the date of the violation. The termination under this subdivision is by the running of a statute of limitation of proceedings.

(3) The processing agency receives information, which it shall verify with the department, that the penalty has been paid to the department pursuant to Section 4772.

(4) If the registered owner of the vehicle provides proof to the processing agency that he or she was not the registered owner on the date of the toll evasion violation.

(b) This section does not limit or impair the ability or the right of the processing agency to pursue the collection of delinquent toll evasion penalties from the person who was the registered owner or lessee of the vehicle on the date of the alleged toll evasion violation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 741, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

40269.5.

(a) (1) An issuing agency shall make a payment plan option available to a person whose monthly income is 200 percent of the current poverty guidelines, or less, as updated periodically in the Federal Register by the United States Department of Health and Human Services under the authority of paragraph (2) of Section 9902 of Title 42 of the United States Code, as determined by the issuing agency or processing agency or their designee.

(2) For purposes of verifying a person’s eligibility an issuing agency or processing agency or their designee shall accept all of the following: (A) unexpired proof of enrollment of participation in the CalFresh program established pursuant to (Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 18900) of
 Part 6 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code), Medi-Cal, or another low-income program with the same or more exacting low-income requirement; or (B) an unexpired county benefit eligibility letter. Other evidence of the persons’ income may also be accepted, as determined to be sufficient by the issuing agency or processing agency or their designee.

(b) The payment plan option for qualifying individuals shall do all of the following:

(1) Apply to toll evasion penalties in excess of one hundred dollars ($100).

(2) Require payment of no more than twenty-five dollars ($25) per month for total outstanding toll evasion penalties of six hundred dollars ($600) or less.

(3) Include no prepayment penalty for paying off the balance prior to the payment
 period expiring.

(4) Include a process for removal of any registration hold placed pursuant to Section 4770.

(c) Information regarding the issuing agency’s payment plan policy shall be posted on an internet website related to the issuing agency’s electronic toll collection system.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the issuing agency shall not be required to offer more than one payment plan to a person at any given time. The issuing agency shall not be required to offer a person more than two payment plans in a six-year period. The issuing agency shall not be required to offer a payment plan if the person has more than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) in outstanding toll evasion penalties.

(e) The requirements of subdivisions (a) and (b) are
 minimum standards only, and shall not limit the discretion of the issuing agency to establish or provide payment plan options that exceed the minimum requirements in those subdivisions, including, but not limited to, allowing payment plans for a person who owes less than the amount specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b), and making a payment plan available to more individuals than those who meet the economic criteria in subdivision (a). For those individuals who exceed the income criteria set forth in subdivision (a), the issuing agency may set payment plan requirements that differ from those established in subdivision (a) or (b), such as requiring higher monthly payments than those specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b), or similar requirements.

(f) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2023, for toll bridges. With respect to toll highways, toll roads, and express lanes, this section shall become operative on July 1,
 2024.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 969, Sec. 16.   (AB 2594)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

40270.

If the notice of delinquent toll evasion violation is filed with the department pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 40267 and the department returns the notice of delinquent toll evasion violation by notice of noncollection pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 4770 or Section 4774, the processing agency may cancel the notice of delinquent toll evasion violation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 739, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

40271.

The time limitation provided by law for commencement of a civil action for a violation specified in Section 40250 shall be tolled from and after the date a notice of delinquent toll evasion violation is filed with the department pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 40267 until the notice is returned to the processing agency under subdivision (b) of Section 4770, or Section 4772 or 4774, or is recalled by the processing agency pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 40255.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 739, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

40272.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an imposition of civil liability for a violation of Section 23302.5 shall not be deemed a conviction of a driver, rentee, lessee, or registered owner and shall not be made part of the driving record of the person upon whom that liability is imposed, nor shall it be used for insurance purposes in connection with the provision of motor vehicle insurance coverage.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 739, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

40273.

Any information obtained pursuant to this article through the use of automated devices shall not be used for any purpose other than to identify, and obtain the mailing address information of, either of the following:

(a) Toll evasion violators, to facilitate the serving of notices of toll evasion violations and notices of delinquent toll evasion violations.

(b) Persons entering a vehicular crossing and toll highway where pay-by-plate toll payment, as defined in Section 23302, is permitted by the toll operator to facilitate the collection of tolls.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 459, Sec. 4.   (AB 628)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Procedure on Arrests [40300. - 40618.]



  ARTICLE 1. Arrests [40300. - 40313.]

40300.

The provisions of this chapter shall govern all peace officers in making arrests for violations of this code without a warrant for offenses committed in their presence, but the procedure prescribed herein shall not otherwise be exclusive of any other method prescribed by law for the arrest and prosecution of a person for an offense of like grade.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

40300.2.

Whenever a person is arrested for a violation of this code, or a violation of any other statute required to be reported under Section 1803, the written complaint, notice to appear in court, or other notice of violation, shall indicate whether the vehicle involved in the offense is a commercial motor vehicle, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 15210.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1509, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

40300.5.

In addition to the authority to make an arrest without a warrant pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 836 of the Penal Code, a peace officer may, without a warrant, arrest a person when the officer has reasonable cause to believe that the person had been driving while under the influence of an alcoholic beverage or any drug, or under the combined influence of an alcoholic beverage and any drug when any of the following exists:

(a) The person is involved in a traffic crash.

(b) The person is observed in or about a vehicle that is obstructing a roadway.

(c) The person will not be apprehended unless immediately arrested.

(d) The person may cause injury to themselves or damage property unless immediately arrested.

(e) The person may destroy or conceal evidence of the crime unless immediately arrested.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 81, Sec. 7.   (AB 2198)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

40300.6.

Section 40300.5 shall be liberally interpreted to further safe roads and the control of driving while under the influence of an alcoholic beverage or any drug in order to permit arrests to be made pursuant to that section within a reasonable time and distance away from the scene of a traffic crash.

The enactment of this section during the 1985–86 Regular Session of the Legislature does not constitute a change in, but is declaratory of, the existing law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 81, Sec. 8.   (AB 2198)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

40301.

Except as provided in this chapter, whenever a person is arrested for any violation of this code declared to be a felony, he shall be dealt with in like manner as upon arrest for the commission of any other felony.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

40302.

Whenever any person is arrested for any violation of this code, not declared to be a felony, the arrested person shall be taken without unnecessary delay before a magistrate within the county in which the offense charged is alleged to have been committed and who has jurisdiction of the offense and is nearest or most accessible with reference to the place where the arrest is made in any of the following cases:

(a) When the person arrested fails to present both his or her driver’s license or other satisfactory evidence of his or her identity and an unobstructed view of his or her full face for examination.

(b) When the person arrested refuses
 to give his or her written promise to appear in court.

(c) When the person arrested demands an immediate appearance before a magistrate.

(d) When the person arrested is charged with violating Section 23152.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 82, Sec. 1.   (AB 346)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

40302.5.

Whenever any person under the age of 18 years is taken into custody in connection with any traffic infraction case, and he is not taken directly before a magistrate, he shall be delivered to the custody of the probation officer. Unless sooner released, the probation officer shall keep the minor in the juvenile hall pending his appearance before a magistrate. When a minor is cited for an offense not involving the driving of a motor vehicle, the minor shall not be taken into custody pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 40302 solely for failure to present a driver’s license.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1299, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

40303.

(a) Whenever a person is arrested for any of the offenses listed in subdivision (b) and the arresting officer is not required to take the person without unnecessary delay before a magistrate, the arrested person shall, in the judgment of the arresting officer, either be given a 10 days’ notice to appear, or be taken without unnecessary delay before a magistrate within the county in which the offense charged is alleged to have been committed and who has jurisdiction of the offense and is nearest or most accessible with reference to the place where the arrest is made. The officer may require that the arrested person, if he or she does not have satisfactory identification, place a right thumbprint, or a left thumbprint or fingerprint if the person has a missing or disfigured right thumb, on the 10 days’ notice to appear when a 10 days’ notice is provided. Except for law enforcement purposes relating to the identity of the arrestee, a person or entity shall not sell, give away, allow the distribution of, include in a database, or create a database with, this print.

(b) Subdivision (a) applies to the following offenses:

(1) Section 10852 or 10853, relating to injuring or tampering with a vehicle.

(2) Section 23103 or 23104, relating to reckless driving.

(3) Subdivision (a) of Section 2800, insofar as it relates to a failure or refusal of the driver of a vehicle to stop and submit to an inspection or test of the lights upon the vehicle pursuant to Section 2804, that is punishable as a misdemeanor.

(4) Subdivision (a) of Section 2800, insofar as it relates to a failure or refusal of the driver of a vehicle to stop and submit to a brake test that is punishable as a misdemeanor.

(5) Subdivision (a) of Section 2800, relating to the refusal to submit vehicle and load to an inspection, measurement, or weighing as prescribed in Section 2802 or a refusal to adjust the load or obtain a permit as prescribed in Section 2803.

(6) Subdivision (a) of Section 2800, insofar as it relates to a driver who continues to drive after being lawfully ordered not to drive by a member of the Department of the California Highway Patrol for violating the driver’s hours of service or driver’s log regulations adopted pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 34501.

(7) Subdivision (b), (c), or (d) of Section 2800, relating to a failure or refusal to comply with a lawful out-of-service order.

(8) Section 20002 or 20003, relating to duties in the event of an accident.

(9) Section 23109, relating to participating in a speed contest or exhibition of speed.

(10) Section 14601, 14601.1, 14601.2, or 14601.5, relating to driving while the privilege to operate a motor vehicle is suspended or revoked.

(11) When the person arrested has attempted to evade arrest.

(12) Section 23332, relating to persons upon vehicular crossings.

(13) Section 2813, relating to the refusal to stop and submit a vehicle to an inspection of its size, weight, and equipment.

(14) Section 21461.5, insofar as it relates to a pedestrian who, after being cited for a violation of Section 21461.5, is, within 24 hours, again found upon the freeway in violation of Section 21461.5 and thereafter refuses to leave the freeway after being lawfully ordered to do so by a peace officer and after having been informed that his or her failure to leave could result in his or her arrest.

(15) Subdivision (a) of Section 2800, insofar as it relates to a pedestrian who, after having been cited for a violation of subdivision (a) of Section 2800 for failure to obey a lawful order of a peace officer issued pursuant to Section 21962, is within 24 hours again found upon the bridge or overpass and thereafter refuses to leave after being lawfully ordered to do so by a peace officer and after having been informed that his or her failure to leave could result in his or her arrest.

(16) Section 21200.5, relating to riding a bicycle while under the influence of an alcoholic beverage or a drug.

(17) Section 21221.5, relating to operating a motorized scooter while under the influence of an alcoholic beverage or a drug.

(c) (1) A person contesting a charge by claiming under penalty of perjury not to be the person issued the notice to appear may choose to submit a right thumbprint, or a left thumbprint if the person has a missing or disfigured right thumb, to the issuing court through his or her local law enforcement agency for comparison with the one placed on the notice to appear. A local law enforcement agency providing this service may charge the requester no more than the actual costs. The issuing court may refer the thumbprint submitted and the notice to appear to the prosecuting attorney for comparison of the thumbprints. When there is no thumbprint or fingerprint on the notice to appear, or when the comparison of thumbprints is inconclusive, the court shall refer the notice to appear or copy thereof back to the issuing agency for further investigation, unless the court finds that referral is not in the interest of justice.

(2) Upon initiation of the investigation or comparison process by referral of the court, the court shall continue the case and the speedy trial period shall be tolled for 45 days.

(3) Upon receipt of the issuing agency’s or prosecuting attorney’s response, the court may make a finding of factual innocence pursuant to Section 530.6 of the Penal Code if the court determines that there is insufficient evidence that the person cited is the person charged and shall immediately notify the Department of Motor Vehicles of its determination. If the Department of Motor Vehicles determines the citation or citations in question formed the basis of a suspension or revocation of the person’s driving privilege, the department shall immediately set aside the action.

(4) If the prosecuting attorney or issuing agency fails to respond to a court referral within 45 days, the court shall make a finding of factual innocence pursuant to Section 530.6 of the Penal Code, unless the court finds that a finding of factual innocence is not in the interest of justice.

(5) The citation or notice to appear may be held by the prosecuting attorney or issuing agency for future adjudication should the arrestee who received the citation or notice to appear be found.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 288, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

40303.5.

An arresting officer shall permit a person arrested for any of the following offenses to execute a notice containing a promise to correct the violation in accordance with the provisions of Section 40610 unless the arresting officer finds that any of the disqualifying conditions specified in subdivision (b) of Section 40610 exist:

(a) A registration infraction set forth in Division 3 (commencing with Section 4000).

(b) A driver’s license infraction set forth in Division 6 (commencing with Section 12500), and subdivision (a) of Section 12951, relating to possession of a driver’s license.

(c) Section 21201, relating to bicycle equipment.

(d) Subdivision (a) of Section 21212.

(e) An infraction involving equipment set forth in Division 12 (commencing with Section 24000), Division 13 (commencing with Section 29000), Division 14.8 (commencing with Section 34500), Division 16 (commencing with Section 36000), Division 16.5 (commencing with Section 38000), and Division 16.7 (commencing with Section 39000).

(f) Section 2482, relating to registration decals for vehicles transporting inedible kitchen grease.

(g) Section 9850, relating to expired vessel registration.

(h) Section 9853.2, relating to the display of vessel identification numbers.

(i) Section 678.11 of the Harbors and Navigation Code, relating to possessing a vessel operator card.

(j) Subparagraph (a) or (c) of Section 190.00 of Title 13 of the California Code of Regulations, relating to the display of vessel identification numbers.

(k) Section 190.01 of Title 13 of the California Code of Regulations, relating to vessel registration stickers.

(l) Section 6565.8 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations, relating to personal floatation devices on vessels.

(m) Section 6569 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations, relating to serviceable fire extinguishers on vessels.

(n) Section 6572 of
 Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations, relating to markings on fire extinguishers on vessels.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 57, Sec. 1.   (AB 591)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

40304.

Whenever any person is arrested by any member of the California Highway Patrol for any violation of any state law regulating the operation of vehicles or the use of the highways declared to be a misdemeanor but which offense is not specified in this code, he shall, in the judgment of the arresting officer, either be given a 10-day notice to appear in the manner provided in this chapter or be taken without unnecessary delay before a magistrate within the county in which the offense charged is alleged to have been committed and who has jurisdiction of the offense and is nearest or most accessible with reference to the place where the arrest is made, or, upon demand of the person arrested, before a magistrate in the judicial district in which the offense is alleged to have been committed.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

40304.5.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, whenever any person is taken into custody for bail to be collected on two or fewer outstanding warrants for failure to appear on a citation for a parking offense or a traffic infraction, the person shall be provided the opportunity immediately to post bail, and shall not be booked, photographed, or fingerprinted, nor shall an arrest record be made, when the amount of bail required to be paid on the warrant may be ascertained by reference to the face thereof or to a fixed schedule of bail, unless and until all of the following requirements have been exhausted:

(a) If the person has sufficient cash in his or her possession, that person shall be given the opportunity immediately to post bail with the person in charge of the jail or his or her designee.

(b) If the person does not have sufficient cash in his or her possession, that person shall be informed of his or her rights and given the opportunity to do all of the following:

(1) Make not less than three completed telephone calls to obtain bail. The person shall be permitted the use of the police or sheriff’s department telephone to make not less than three completed local or collect long-distance telephone calls to obtain bail.

(2) Have not less than three hours in which to arrange for the deposit of bail.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 35, Sec. 3.   Effective March 8, 1984.   Operative March 31, 1984, by Sec. 7 of Ch. 35.)
-------------------------------------------

40305.
